verbs.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+V1 +V2 +V3 +Pres +Past +1Sg +2Sg +3Sg

!Lexicon containing lexical stems:
LEXICON Root
    sak V3 ; ! talk
    myl V2 ; ! love
    dar V3 ; ! do
    valg V3 ; ! eat
    laimin V1 ; ! bless
    praš V3 ; ! ask
    tur V2 ; ! have
    nor V2 ; ! want
    gal V2 ; ! able/con
    raš V3 ; ! write
    skait V3 ; ! read
    gyven V1 ; ! live
    galvoj V1; ! think    

! Lexicon for V1 POS tag
LEXICON V1 
+V1: V1-suff ;

! Lexicon for V2 POS tag
LEXICON V2 
+V2: V2-suff ;

! Lexicon for V3 POS tag
LEXICON V3
+V3: V3-suff ;

! Lexicon containing class 1 inflectional suffixes and tags:
LEXICON V1-suff
+Pres+1Sg:u # ;
+Pres+2Sg:i # ;
+Pres+3Sg:a # ;
+Past+1Sg:au # ;
+Past+2Sg:ai # ;
+Past+3Sg:o # ;

! Lexicon containing class 2 inflectional suffixes and tags:
LEXICON V2-suff
+Pres+1Sg:iu # ;
+Pres+2Sg:i # ;
+Pres+3Sg:i # ;
+Past+1Sg:ėjau # ;
+Past+2Sg:ėjai # ;
+Past+3Sg:ėjo # ;

! Lexicon containing class 3 inflectional suffixes and tags:
LEXICON V3-suff
+Pres+1Sg:au # ;
+Pres+2Sg:ai # ;
+Pres+3Sg:o # ;
+Past+1Sg:iau # ;
+Past+2Sg:ei # ;
+Past+3Sg:ė # ;
